California statutes. Civil Code
 FOR SENIORS IN AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE VALUE OF THE HOME.The Smith example can be illustrated as follows:A.$150,000 =Value of home at time of loan.B.$300,000 =Estimated value of home at end of life expectancy (18 years, 4% annual appreciation).C.$240,000 =Loan (80% of B).D.$150,000 =Total appreciation (B
 less A).E.$ 37,500 =Lender’s share of appreciation (25% × D).F.$ 96,057 =Payoff of preexisting mortgage, plus interest.G.$106,443 =Amount from which monthly payment is calculated (C less E less F).H.$ 184 =Monthly payment (based on G) to the Smiths. At death or other maturity event, the sum of all monthly payments,
 plus interest, plus the lender’s share of appreciation, plus the amount owing from payoff of the old mortgage, must be paid to the lender.III
ACTUAL CONTINGENT INTEREST
This Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors provides that you, as borrower, must pay to the lender, as actual contingent interest, a share of up to 25 percent of the net appreciated value of the real property which secures the loan. This actual contingent interest is due and payable whenever a maturity event occurs. The dollar amount of actual contingent interest, if any, which you will be required to pay cannot be determined at this time. If the property does not appreciate, you will owe us nothing as actual contingent interest, and will only have to repay principal and stated interest. Actual contingent interest will not become due if title to
 the property is transferred on your death to a spouse who is a coborrower, or where a transfer results from a decree of dissolution of a marriage and a spouse who is a coborrower becomes the sole owner.

Your obligation to pay actual contingent interest and stated interest will reduce the amount of the appreciation, if any, that you will realize on the property over and above its value today. Appreciation will not produce a real gain in your equity in the property unless the appreciation rate exceeds the general inflation rate, but you will be required to pay a portion of the appreciation as actual contingent interest without regard to whether the appreciation has resulted in a real gain.

When your home is sold or refinanced, you normally will receive enough cash to pay the total loan obligation. However, if you sell and provide financing to the buyer, you may possibly not receive enough cash to pay the actual contingent
 interest, and, in that event, it will be necessary for you to provide cash from other funds. In no event, however, will your total loan obligation exceed the value of your home at the time of occurrence of a maturity event, unless you have willfully caused damage to the property.

Calculating the actual contingent interest. Actual contingent interest will be calculated as follows:FAIR MARKET VALUE OF THE PROPERTY ON DATE OF MATURITY EVENT
(Sale Price or Appraised Value)–(less)CURRENT VALUE OF THE PROPERTY–(less)VALUE OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS MADE BY YOU 
(Must exceed $1,000 in cost. )×(times)LENDER’S APPRECIATION SHARE (up to 
25%)=(equals)ACTUAL CONTINGENT INTERESTBelow are answers to two frequently asked questions about the Shared Appreciation Loans for Seniors program. If you have any further questions, feel free to call the lender at
 ____, or write to the lender at ____.

Question. What if I marry, or my spouse is not a coborrower?

Answer. Your Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors will be due upon the death of the last surviving coborrower. Your lender will be happy to include a new or present spouse as a coborrower, provided the new spouse is over age __ at the time he or she becomes a coborrower. Because the monthly payment annuity is based upon the projected life span of the youngest coborrower, the annuity will be readjusted if a new, younger coborrower is added. The annuity will be adjusted to reflect the annuity that would have existed had the new coborrower been a coborrower from the beginning of the loan period. Since the monthly annuity is based on a fixed “lendable amount” derived from projected appreciation of the home (see Section II, above), a longer projected loan period, because of the younger age of the new coborrower, will result in a
 decrease in the size of the monthly annuity.

Question. Can I obtain an additional advance for home improvements?

Answer. Yes, provided your lender approves of the improvement. Your lender will act reasonably in reviewing your request. At the time the advance is made, your lender will calculate the amount of interest at the stated interest rate that will accrue through the projected life of the loan, as it was determined at the time the loan was made. This amount will be deducted from the original lendable amount, and a new annuity calculated, based upon the calculations described in Section II. The effect is the same as if the advance had been made at the outset of the loan, except, of course, you will not be responsible for any interest until the funds are actually advanced. Your annuity will, however, be smaller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1406, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.712.

(a) Each lender making a shared appreciation loan for seniors shall also furnish to the prospective borrower, prior to the consummation of the loan, the disclosures required by Subpart C of Federal Reserve Board Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. Part 226), including 12 C.F.R. Section 226.18(f), to the extent applicable to the transaction.

(b) The disclosure made pursuant to subdivision (a) and Regulation Z shall be based on the fixed interest rate of the shared appreciation loan for seniors, and shall include a description of the shared appreciation feature, including (1)
 the conditions for its imposition, the time at which it would be collected, and the limitations on the lender’s share, as required by the Federal Reserve Board in the information published by the board in 46 Federal Register 20877-78 (April 7, 1981), and (2) the lender’s share of the appreciated value and the prevailing interest rate as defined in Section 1917.320.

(c) The disclosure made pursuant to subdivision (a) and Regulation Z shall be accompanied by (1) several transaction-specific examples of the operation and effect of the shared appreciation loan and (2) the following charts comparing the shared appreciation loan and a conventional loan made at the prevailing interest rate, and illustrating the possible increase in the monthly payments, and the possible annual percentage rate of finance charge, on the assumptions therein stated: Chart 1CONVENTIONAL MORTGAGE AT ____%If the same loan balance were financed under a conventional, 30-year, fixed-rate, level-payment mortgage, your monthly payments would be:Years 1–30$_______/mo.Chart 2IF YOU REFINANCE THIS TRANSACTION AT ___%If your property appreciates at 10% per year, and if your loan obligation (including contingent interest due) at the end of __ years is refinanced at __% (the prevailing market interest rate now), your monthly payments will be:Years 1–__Refinancing loan$_______/mo.$_______/mo.**Refinancing loan, assuming a conventional, 30-year, fixed-rate, level-payment mortgage. Other mortgage instruments, e.g., graduated-payment or shared-appreciation, if available, may result in lower payments.Chart 3APR IF PROPERTY APPRECIATES AT 10%If your property appreciates at 10% per year, the total finance charge on your shared appreciation loan for seniors (including contingent interest) will equal $____, and the annual percentage rate of the total finance charge (including actual contingent interest) will equal ____%.(d) The disclosures required by subdivision (c) shall be separate from the disclosures required by Regulation Z, and may be presented in the document containing the disclosures required by Regulation Z or in one or more separate documents.

(e) Except to the extent that this section requires disclosure of additional information not required by Regulation Z, compliance with the applicable credit disclosure requirements of Regulation Z shall constitute compliance with the requirements of this section.

(f) The disclosure prescribed in Section 1917.711 shall be physically attached to the disclosures required by this section and Regulation Z at the time the Regulation Z disclosures are furnished to the borrower.

(g) In the event federal law is amended so that this section is inconsistent therewith, the federal law shall prevail as to the disclosures required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.713.

Each lender making a shared appreciation loan for seniors shall additionally furnish to the prospective borrower, prior to consummation of the loan, a statement containing the following information:
IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT YOUR SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN FOR SENIORS

You are being offered a shared appreciation loan. Before you decide to accept this loan, read this statement, which is designed to provide important information you should consider.

1. Prevailing interest rate: __%.

2. Stated interest rate on this loan: __%.

3. Projected contingent interest: __%.

4. Initial amount of this loan: $__.

5. Amount of the monthly annuity payments you will receive: $__.

6. Projected term of this loan: __ years.

7. Projected total loan obligation you will have to pay, assuming the loan continues to the end of the “borrower’s” life expectancy: $__.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.714.

Each deed of trust and evidence of debt executed in connection with a shared appreciation loan for seniors shall contain a statement, printed or written in a size equal to at least 12-point bold type, consisting of substantially the following language: “THIS IS A [DURATION] SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN FOR SENIORS. THE LENDER'S INTEREST INCLUDES [PERCENT] OF THE NET APPRECIATED VALUE OF THE PROPERTY. A BALLOON PAYMENT OF PRINCIPAL WILL BE REQUIRED. FOR FURTHER INFORMATION, READ THE FLYER ENTITLED "INFORMATION ABOUT THE [NAME OF LENDER] SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN FOR SENIORS.”’ The notice required by this section shall be
 completed to state the terms of the shared appreciation loan and the lender’s share of the net appreciated value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Mortgage Loans [1918.5. - 1921.]

1918.5.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Evidence of debt” means a note or negotiable instrument.

(b) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Business and Consumer Services.

(c) “Secretary’s designee” means the director of a department within the agency that licenses or regulates the institutions, organizations, or persons engaged in a business related to or affecting compliance with this chapter.

(d) “Security document” means a mortgage contract, deed of trust, real estate sales contract, or any note or negotiable instrument issued in connection therewith, when its purpose is to finance the purchase or construction of real property occupied or intended to be occupied by the borrower, containing four or fewer residential units or on which four or fewer residential units are to be constructed.

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 13.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1920.

Any mortgage instrument that is made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall meet the following requirements:

(a) Standards for the adjustment of interest rates or monthly payments shall consider factors which can reasonably be deemed to affect the ability of borrowers to meet their mortgage obligations.

(b) No change in interest provided for in any provision for a variable interest rate contained in a security document,
or evidence of debt issued in connection therewith, shall be valid unless the provision is set forth in the security document, and in any evidence of debt issued in connection therewith, and the document or documents contain the following provisions:

(1) A statement attached to the security document and to any evidence of debt issued in connection therewith printed or written in a size equal to at least 10-point bold type, consisting of language authorized by the secretary or the secretary’s designee notifying the borrower that the mortgage may provide for changes in interest, principal loan balance, payment, or the loan term.

(2) Before the due date of the first monthly installment following each change in the interest rate, notice shall be mailed to the borrower of the following:

(A) The base index.

(B) The most recently published index at the date of the change in the rate. 

(C) The interest rate in effect as a result of the change.

(D) Any change in the monthly installment.

(E) The amount of the unpaid principal balance.

(F) If the interest scheduled to be paid on the due date exceeds the amount of the installment, a statement to that effect and the amount of the excess, and the address and telephone number of the office of the lender to which inquiries may be made.

(c) The borrower is permitted to prepay the loan in whole or in part without a prepayment charge at any time, and no fee or other charge may be required by
the lender of the borrower as a result of any change in the interest rate, the payment, the outstanding principal loan balance, or the loan term.

(d) Changes in the rate of interest on the loan shall reflect the movement of an index, which shall be authorized by the secretary or the secretary’s designee.

(e) To the extent that any monthly installment is less than the amount of interest accrued during the month with respect to which the installment is payable, the borrower shall be notified of such instance in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary or the secretary’s designee. Such notice shall include, but not be limited to, the amount of interest exceeding the monthly installment, and any borrower options under these circumstances.

(f) The lender shall provide to the borrower, prior to the execution by the
borrower of any mortgage payment instrument authorized pursuant to this chapter, full and complete disclosure, as specified by the secretary or the secretary’s designee, of the nature and effect of the mortgage payment instrument, and all costs or savings attributed to the mortgage instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 232, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1921.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Adjustable-rate residential mortgage loan” means any loan or credit sale which is primarily for personal, family, or household purposes which bears interest at a rate subject to change during the term of the loan, whether predetermined or otherwise, and which is made upon the security of real property containing not less than one nor more than four dwelling units.

(2) “Lender” means any person, association, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, or other
business entity making, in any 12-month period, more than 10 loans or credit sales upon the security of residential real property containing not less than one nor more than four dwelling units.

(b) Any lender offering adjustable-rate residential mortgage loans shall provide to prospective borrowers a copy of the most recent available publication of the Federal Reserve Board that is designed to provide the public with descriptive information concerning adjustable-rate mortgages (currently entitled “Consumer Handbook on Adjustable Rate Mortgages”), either upon the prospective borrower’s request or at the same time the lender first provides written information, other than direct-mail advertising, concerning any adjustable-rate residential mortgage loan or credit sale to the prospective borrower, whichever is earlier. Any lender who fails to comply with the requirements of this section may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction and
shall be liable for actual damages, the costs of the action, and reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court. The court may make those orders as may be necessary to prevent future violations of this section.

(c) A lender that makes adjustable-rate mortgage loan disclosures pursuant to either Part 29 of Chapter I of, or Part 563 of Chapter V of, Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, may comply with this section by providing the descriptive information required by subdivision (b) at the same time and under the same circumstances that it makes disclosures in accordance with those federal regulations. Such a lender shall also display and make the descriptive information available to the public in an area of the lender’s office that is open to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Reverse Mortgages [1923. - 1923.10.]

1923.

For purposes of this chapter, “reverse mortgage” means a nonrecourse loan secured by real property that meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The loan provides cash advances to a borrower based on the equity or the value in a borrower’s owner-occupied principal residence.

(b) The loan requires no payment of principal or interest until the entire loan becomes due and payable.

(c) The loan is made by a lender licensed or chartered pursuant to the laws of this state or the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.2.

A reverse mortgage loan shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Prepayment, in whole or in part, shall be permitted without penalty at any time during the term of the reverse mortgage loan. For the purposes of this section, penalty does not include any fees, payments, or other charges that would have otherwise been due upon the reverse
mortgage being due and payable.

(b) A reverse mortgage loan may provide for a fixed or adjustable interest rate or combination thereof, including compound interest, and may also provide for interest that is contingent on the value of the property upon execution of the loan or at maturity, or on changes in value between closing and maturity.

(c) A reverse mortgage may include costs and fees that are charged by the lender, or the lender’s designee, originator, or servicer, including costs and fees charged upon execution of the loan, on a periodic basis, or upon maturity.

(d) If a reverse mortgage loan provides for periodic advances to a borrower, these advances shall not be reduced in amount or number based on any adjustment in the interest rate.

(e) A
lender who fails to make loan advances as required in the loan documents, and fails to cure an actual default after notice as specified in the loan documents, shall forfeit to the borrower treble the amount wrongfully withheld plus interest at the legal rate.

(f) The reverse mortgage loan may become due and payable upon the occurrence of any one of the following events:

(1) The home securing the loan is sold or title to the home is otherwise transferred.

(2) All borrowers cease occupying the home as a principal residence, except as provided in subdivision (g).

(3) Any fixed maturity date agreed to by the lender and the borrower occurs.

(4) An event occurs which is specified in the loan
documents and which jeopardizes the lender’s security.

(g) Repayment of the reverse mortgage loan shall be subject to the following additional conditions:

(1) Temporary absences from the home not exceeding 60 consecutive days shall not cause the mortgage to become due and payable.

(2) Extended absences from the home exceeding 60 consecutive days, but less than one year, shall not cause the mortgage to become due and payable if the borrower has taken prior action which secures and protects the home in a manner satisfactory to the lender, as specified in the loan documents.

(3) The lender’s right to collect reverse mortgage loan proceeds shall be subject to the applicable statute of limitations for written loan contracts. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the statute of limitations shall commence on the date that the reverse mortgage loan becomes due and payable as provided in the loan agreement.

(4) The lender shall prominently disclose in the loan agreement any interest rate or other fees to be charged during the period that commences on the date that the reverse mortgage loan becomes due and payable, and that ends when repayment in full is made.

(h) The first page of any deed of trust securing a reverse mortgage loan shall contain the following statement in 10-point boldface type: “This deed of trust secures a reverse mortgage loan.”

(i) A lender or any other person that participates in the origination of the mortgage shall not require an applicant for a reverse mortgage to purchase an annuity as a condition of obtaining a reverse mortgage
loan.

(1) The lender or any other person that participates in the origination of the mortgage shall not do either of the following:

(A) Participate in, be associated with, or employ any party that participates in or is associated with any other financial or insurance activity, unless the lender maintains procedural safeguards designed to ensure that individuals participating in the origination of the mortgage shall have no involvement with, or incentive to provide the prospective borrower with, any other financial or insurance product.

(B) Refer the borrower to anyone for the purchase of an annuity or other financial or insurance product prior to the closing of the reverse mortgage or before the expiration of the right of the borrower to rescind the reverse mortgage agreement.

(2) This subdivision does not prevent a lender from offering or referring borrowers for title insurance, hazard, flood, or other peril insurance, or other similar products that are customary and normal under a reverse mortgage loan.

(3) A lender or any other person who participates in the origination of a reverse mortgage loan to which this subdivision would apply, and who complies with paragraph (1) of subsection (n), and with subsection (o), of Section 1715z-20 of Title 12 of the United States Code, and any regulations and guidance promulgated under that section, as amended from time to time, in offering the loan, regardless of whether the loan is originated pursuant to the program authorized under Section 1715z-20 of Title 12 of the United States Code, and any regulations and guidance promulgated under that section, shall be deemed to have complied with this subdivision.

(j) Prior to accepting a final and complete application for a reverse mortgage the lender shall provide the borrower with a list of not fewer than 10 counseling agencies that are approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development to engage in reverse mortgage counseling as provided in Subpart B of Part 214 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulation. The counseling agency shall not receive any compensation, either directly or indirectly, from the lender or from any other person or entity involved in originating or servicing the mortgage or the sale of annuities, investments, long-term care insurance, or any other type of financial or insurance product. This subdivision does not prevent a counseling agency from receiving financial assistance that is unrelated to the offering or selling of a reverse mortgage loan and that is provided by the lender as part of charitable or philanthropic activities.

(k) A lender shall not accept a final and complete application for a reverse mortgage loan from a prospective applicant or assess any fees upon a prospective applicant until the lapse of seven days from the date of counseling, as evidenced by the counseling certification, and without first receiving certification from the applicant or the applicant’s authorized representative that the applicant has received counseling from an agency as described in subdivision (j) and that the counseling was conducted in person, unless the certification specifies that the applicant elected to receive the counseling in a manner other than in person. The certification shall be signed by the borrower and the agency counselor, and shall include the date of the counseling and the name, address, and telephone number of both the counselor and the applicant. Electronic facsimile copy of the housing counseling certification satisfies the requirements of this subdivision.
The lender shall maintain the certification in an accurate, reproducible, and accessible format for the term of the reverse mortgage.

(l) A lender shall not make a reverse mortgage loan without first complying with, or in the case of brokered loans ensuring compliance with, the requirements of Section 1632, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 854, Sec. 2.   (AB 1700)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.3.

A reverse mortgage shall constitute a lien against the subject property to the extent of all advances made pursuant to the reverse mortgage and all interest accrued on these advances, and that lien shall have priority over any lien filed or recorded after recordation of a reverse mortgage loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.4.

For the purposes of this chapter, a property shall be deemed to be owner-occupied, notwithstanding that the legal title to the property is held in the name of a trust, provided that the occupant of the property is a beneficiary of that trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.5.

(a) No reverse mortgage loan application shall be taken by a lender unless the loan applicant, prior to receiving counseling, has received from the lender the following plain language statement in conspicuous 16-point type or larger, advising the prospective borrower about counseling prior to obtaining the reverse mortgage loan:

IMPORTANT NOTICE
TO
REVERSE MORTGAGE LOAN APPLICANT

A REVERSE MORTGAGE IS A COMPLEX FINANCIAL TRANSACTION. IF YOU DECIDE TO OBTAIN A REVERSE MORTGAGE LOAN, YOU WILL SIGN BINDING LEGAL DOCUMENTS THAT WILL HAVE IMPORTANT LEGAL AND FINANCIAL IMPLICATIONS FOR YOU AND YOUR ESTATE. IT IS THEREFORE IMPORTANT TO UNDERSTAND THE TERMS OF THE REVERSE MORTGAGE AND ITS EFFECT ON YOUR FUTURE NEEDS. BEFORE ENTERING INTO THIS TRANSACTION, YOU ARE REQUIRED TO CONSULT WITH AN INDEPENDENT REVERSE MORTGAGE LOAN COUNSELOR TO DISCUSS WHETHER OR NOT A REVERSE MORTGAGE IS RIGHT FOR YOU. A LIST OF APPROVED COUNSELORS WILL BE PROVIDED TO YOU BY THE LENDER.

SENIOR CITIZEN ADVOCACY GROUPS ADVISE AGAINST USING THE PROCEEDS OF A REVERSE MORTGAGE TO PURCHASE AN ANNUITY OR RELATED FINANCIAL PRODUCTS. IF YOU ARE CONSIDERING USING YOUR PROCEEDS FOR THIS PURPOSE, YOU SHOULD DISCUSS THE FINANCIAL IMPLICATIONS OF DOING SO WITH YOUR COUNSELOR AND FAMILY MEMBERS.
(b) (1) In addition to the plain language notice described in subdivision (a), no reverse mortgage loan application shall be taken by a lender unless the lender provides the prospective borrower, prior to his or her meeting with a counseling agency on reverse mortgages, with a reverse mortgage worksheet guide, or in the event that the prospective borrower seeks counseling prior to requesting a reverse mortgage loan application from the reverse mortgage lender, the counseling agency shall provide the prospective borrower with the following plain language reverse mortgage worksheet guide in 14-point type or larger:

Reverse Mortgage Worksheet Guide—Is a Reverse Mortgage Right for Me?

To decide if a recommended purchase of a reverse mortgage is right for you, consider all of your goals, needs, and available
options. This self-evaluation worksheet has five essential questions for you to consider when deciding if a reverse mortgage is right for you.

Directions: The State of California advises you to carefully read and complete this worksheet, and bring it with you to your counseling session. You may make notes on a separate piece of paper with questions you may have about whether a reverse mortgage is right for you. During the counseling session, you can speak openly and confidentially with a professional reverse mortgage counselor, independent of the lender, who can help you understand what it means for you to become involved with this particular loan.

1. What happens to others in your home after you die or move out?

Rule: When the borrower dies, moves, or is absent from the home for 12 consecutive months, the loan may become due.

Considerations: Having a reverse mortgage affects the future of all those living with you. If the loan cannot be paid off, then the home will have to be sold in order to satisfy the lender. To determine if this is an issue for you, ask yourself:

(A) Who is currently living in the home with you?

(B) What will they do when you die or permanently move from the home?

(C) Have you discussed this with all those living with you or any family members?

(D) Who will pay off the loan, and have you discussed this with them?

(E) If your heirs do not have enough money to pay off the loan, the home will pass into foreclosure.

Do you need to discuss this with your counselor? Yes or No

2. Do you know that you can default on a reverse mortgage?

Rule: There are three continuous financial obligations. If you fail to keep up with your insurance, property taxes, and home maintenance, you will go into default. Uncured defaults lead to foreclosures. 

Considerations: Will you have adequate resources and income to support your financial needs and obligations once you have removed all of your available equity with a reverse mortgage? To determine if this is an issue for you, ask yourself:

(A) Are you contemplating a lump-sum withdrawal?

(B) What other resources will you have once you have reached your equity withdrawal limit?

(C) Will you have funds to pay for unexpected medical expenses?

(D) Will you have the ability to finance alternative living accommodations, such as independent living, assisted living, or a long-term care nursing home?

(E) Will you have the ability to finance routine or catastrophic home repairs, especially if maintenance is a factor that may determine when the mortgage becomes payable?

Do you need to discuss this with your counselor? Yes or No

3. Have you fully explored other options?

Rule: Less costly options may exist.

Consideration: Reverse mortgages are compounding-interest loans, and the debt to the lender increases as time goes on. You may want
to consider using less expensive alternatives or other assets you may have before you commit to a reverse mortgage. To determine if this is an issue for you, consider:

(A) Alternative financial options for seniors may include, but not be limited to, less costly home equity lines of credit, property tax deferral programs, or governmental aid programs.

(B) Other types of lending arrangements may be available and less costly. You may be able to use your home equity to secure loans from family members, friends, or would-be heirs.

Do you need to discuss this with your counselor? Yes or No

4. Are you intending to use the reverse mortgage to purchase a financial product?

Rule: Reverse mortgages are interest-accruing loans.

Considerations: Due to the high cost and increasing debt incurred by reverse mortgage borrowers, using home equity to finance investments is not suitable in most instances. To determine if this is an issue for you, consider:

(A) The cost of the reverse mortgage loan may exceed any financial gain from any product purchased.

(B) Will the financial product you are considering freeze or otherwise tie up your money?

(C) There may be high surrender fees, service charges, or undisclosed costs on the financial products purchased with the proceeds of a reverse mortgage.

(D) Has the sales agent offering the financial product discussed suitability with you?

Do you need to discuss
this with your counselor? Yes or No

5. Do you know that a reverse mortgage may impact your eligibility for government assistance programs?

Rule: Income received from investments will count against individuals seeking government assistance.

Considerations: Converting your home equity into investments may create nonexempt asset statuses. To determine if this is an issue for you, consider:

(A) There are state and federal taxes on the income investments financed through home equity.

(B) If you go into a nursing home for an extended period of time, the reverse mortgage loan will become due, the home may be sold, and any proceeds from the sale of the home may make you ineligible for government benefits.

(C) If the homeowner is a Medi-Cal beneficiary, a reverse mortgage may make it difficult to transfer ownership of the home, thus resulting in Medi-Cal recovery.

Do you need to discuss this with your counselor? Yes or No

(2) The reverse mortgage worksheet guide required in paragraph (1) shall be signed by the agency counselor, if the counseling is done in person, and by the prospective borrower and returned to the lender along with the certification of counseling required under subdivision (k) of Section 1923.2, and the loan application shall not be approved until the signed reverse mortgage worksheet guide is provided to the lender. A copy of the reverse mortgage worksheet guide shall be provided to the borrower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 854, Sec. 3.   (AB 1700)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.6.

The lender shall be presumed to have satisfied any disclosure duty imposed by this chapter if the lender provides a disclosure statement in the same form as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.7.

No arrangement, transfer, or lien subject to this chapter shall be invalidated solely because of the failure of a lender to comply with any provision of this chapter. However, nothing in this section shall preclude the application of any other existing civil remedies provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.9.

(a) To the extent that implementation of this section does not conflict with federal law resulting in the loss of federal funding, reverse mortgage loan payments made to a borrower shall be treated as proceeds from a loan and not as income for the purpose of determining eligibility and benefits under means-tested programs of aid to individuals.

(b) Undisbursed reverse mortgage funds shall be treated as equity in the borrower’s home and not as proceeds from a loan, resources,
or assets for the purpose of determining eligibility and benefits under means-tested programs of aid to individuals.

(c) This section applies to any law or program relating to payments, allowances, benefits, or services provided on a means-tested basis, by this state, including, but not limited to, optional state supplements to the federal supplemental security income program, low-income energy assistance, property tax relief, general assistance, and medical assistance only to the extent this section does not conflict with Title 19 of the federal Social Security Act.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “means-tested programs and aid to individuals” includes, but is not limited to, programs set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9, and Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 9, of the Welfare and Institutions
Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.10.

This chapter shall only apply to those reverse mortgage loans executed on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 5. HIRING [1925. - 1997.270.]



  CHAPTER 1. Hiring in General [1925. - 1938.]

1925.

Hiring is a contract by which one gives to another the temporary possession and use of property, other than money, for reward, and the latter agrees to return the same to the former at a future time.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.

The products of a thing hired, during the hiring, belong to the hirer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.

An agreement to let upon hire binds the letter to secure to the hirer the quiet possession of the thing hired during the term of the hiring, against all persons lawfully claiming the same.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1928.

The hirer of a thing must use ordinary care for its preservation in safety and in good condition.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1929.

The hirer of a thing must repair all deteriorations or injuries thereto occasioned by his want of ordinary care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

1930.

When a thing is let for a particular purpose the hirer must not use it for any other purpose; and if he does, he is liable to the letter for all damages resulting from such use, or the letter may treat the contract as thereby rescinded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

1931.

The letter of a thing may terminate the hiring and reclaim the thing before the end of the term agreed upon:

1. When the hirer uses or permits a use of the thing hired in a manner contrary to the agreement of the parties; or,

2. When the hirer does not, within a reasonable time after request, make such repairs as he is bound to make.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1932.

The hirer of a thing may terminate the hiring before the end of the term agreed upon:

1. When the letter does not, within a reasonable time after request, fulfill his obligations, if any, as to placing and securing the hirer in the quiet possession of the thing hired, or putting it into good condition, or repairing; or,

2. When the greater part of the thing hired, or that part which was and which the letter had at the time of the hiring reason to believe was the material inducement to the hirer to
enter into the contract, perishes from any other cause than the want of ordinary care of the hirer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

1933.

The hiring of a thing terminates:

1. At the end of the term agreed upon;

2. By the mutual consent of the parties;

3. By the hirer acquiring a title to the thing hired superior to that of the letter; or,

4. By the destruction of the thing hired.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1934.

If the hiring of a thing is terminable at the pleasure of one of the parties, it is terminated by notice to the other of his death or incapacity to contract. In other cases it is not terminated thereby.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1934.5.
